Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB660.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 350.028 is amended to read as follows:
The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall have and exercise the following authority and
powers:
(1) To adopt administrative regulations after a hearing pertaining to surface coal
mining operations including strip mining and the surface effects of underground
mining to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;
(2) To conduct investigations and hearings under provisions of this chapter or
regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(3) To issue, after an opportunity for a hearing, suspension orders or show cause orders
requiring an operator, permittee, or person to adopt remedial measures that are
necessary to comply with this chapter and administrative regulations adopted
pursuant thereto. Failure to attend a hearing shall be excused for good cause shown;
(4) To issue, after an opportunity for a hearing, a final order imposing civil penalties
for violations of this chapter or directing the Department for Natural Resources to
revoke a permit, when the requirements set forth by the notice of noncompliance,
order of cessation, or an order of the cabinet requiring remedial measures have not
been complied with according to the terms therein. When the secretary or his or her
authorized representatives determines that a pattern of violations of any
requirements of this chapter or any permit conditions required by this chapter exists
or has existed, and if the secretary or his or her authorized representatives also find
that the violations are caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply
with any requirements of this chapter or any permit conditions or that the violations
are willfully caused by the permittee, the secretary or his or her authorized
representative shall forthwith issue an order to the permittee to show cause as to
why the permit should not be suspended or revoked and shall provide an
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1865
opportunity for a hearing. Failure to attend a hearing shall be excused for good
cause shown; and
(5) To adopt administrative regulations to allow the state to administer and enforce the
initial and permanent regulatory programs of Public Law 95-87, "Surface Mining
Control and Reclamation Act of 1977." Administrative regulations shall be no more
stringent than required by that law. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as
superseding, amending, modifying, or repealing any of the acts listed in Section
702(a) of Public Law 95-87, or any administrative regulation promulgated
thereunder.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:28 AM Jacketed